District of Columbia statutes.
25-444

Protest hearings; parties identified.

(a)

If a protest is filed in a contested case, the Board shall hold a protest hearing for the purpose of receiving evidence and testimony regarding the appropriateness of the licensing action.

(b)

The parties to the protest hearing shall be the applicant and the protestants as identified at the administrative review.

(c)

If there is more than one protestant, the Board, in its discretion, may require the protestants to confer among themselves and designate one person to conduct the protestants’ case.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-432.